test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-guohtom_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - guohtom: # -udda med stv, omljud och vokalslut (add uä variant!)
    guohtom+N+Sg+Nom: guohtom
    guohtom+N+Sg+Gen: guohtoma
    guohtom+N+Sg+Acc: guohtomav
    guohtom+N+Sg+Ill: guohtomij
    guohtom+N+Sg+Ine: guohtomin
    guohtom+N+Sg+Ela: guohtomist
    guohtom+N+Sg+Com: guohtomijn
    guohtom+N+Pl+Nom: guohtoma
    guohtom+N+Pl+Gen: guohtomij
    guohtom+N+Pl+Acc: guohtomijd
    guohtom+N+Pl+Ill: guohtomijda
    guohtom+N+Pl+Ine: guohtomijn
    guohtom+N+Pl+Ela: guohtomijst
    guohtom+N+Pl+Com: guohtomij
    guohtom+N+Ess: guohtomin
    guohtom+N+Abe: guohtomahtá

 
 
